Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-6719
Legislative findings.

The Legislature finds that the administration of medications by persons other than oneself or one's caretaker should be a regulated act and there is a need to define a system to safely assist individuals to take medications who do not have the ability to take medications independently. The Medication Aide Act sets forth provisions of such a system.

Laws 1998, LB 1354, § 9.